test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ngaedarasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈэдаравыди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈэдаравыти’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэхэти’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэхэ”нати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ӈэдаравэхэтати’, ӈэдаравэхэтти’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈэдаравы”манати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэва”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэва”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэнана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈэдаравэхэдана”, ӈэдаравэхэдна”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэвнана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэюна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэюна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэюна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдаравына”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравына”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈэдаравы”на”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэ”на”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэ”нана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈэдаравэхэтана”, ӈэдаравэхэтна”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈэдаравы”манана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэра”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэмда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэнда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэнда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэнанда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэданда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэвнанда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэюда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэюда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэюта”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдаравыда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравыда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈэдаравыта”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэта”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэ”ната”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ӈэдаравэхэтата”, ӈэдаравэхэтта”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈэдаравы”маната”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэмдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэндо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэндо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэнандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэдандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэвнандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэюдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэюдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэюто’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдаравыдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравыдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈэдаравыто’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэто’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэ”нато’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ӈэдаравэхэтато’, ӈэдаравэхэтто’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈэдаравы”манато’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Abs: ӈэдаравэд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравэдав, ӈэдаравэдув, ӈэдаравэдами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравэдав, ӈэдаравэдув, ӈэдаравэдами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравэдан, ӈэдаравэдани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэдар
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэдамд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэданд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэдада
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэдамда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэданда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэдами’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравэдами
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэдами’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравэдами
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэдани’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравэдани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэдари’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэдамди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэданди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэдади’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэдамди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэданди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэдава”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэдава”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэдана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэдара”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэдамда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэданда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэдадо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэдамдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэдандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: ӈэдаравэдм’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: ӈэдаравэн
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: ӈэдаравы
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: ӈэдаравэни’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: ӈэдаравэди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: ӈэдаравэхэ’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: ӈэдаравэва”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: ӈэдаравэда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: ӈэдаравы”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈэдаравэдамзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈэдаравэнась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: [ӈэдаравысь, ӈэдаравэсь]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈэдаравэнинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈэдаравэдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈэдаравэхэнзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈэдаравэваць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈэдаравэдаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: [ӈэдаравыць, ӈэдаравэць]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg1: ӈэдаравэв
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэр
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэми’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэри’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэва”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэра”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg1: ӈэдаравэвась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэрась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэминзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэринзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэваць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэраць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэдонзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg1: ӈэдаравэхэюн
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэхэюд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэхэюда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэхэюни’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэхэюди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэхэюди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэюна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэюда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэюдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg1: ӈэдаравэхэюнась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg2: ӈэдаравэхэюдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg3: ӈэдаравэхэюдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu1: ӈэдаравэхэюнинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu2: ӈэдаравэхэюдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu3: ӈэдаравэхэюдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl1: ӈэдаравэхэюнаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl2: ӈэдаравэхэюдаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl3: ӈэдаравэхэюдонзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg1: ӈэдаравын
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg2: ӈэдаравыд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg3: ӈэдаравыда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu1: ӈэдаравыни’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu2: ӈэдаравыди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu3: ӈэдаравыди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl1: ӈэдаравына”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl2: ӈэдаравыда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl3: ӈэдаравыдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg1: ӈэдаравынась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg2: ӈэдаравыдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg3: ӈэдаравыдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu1: ӈэдаравынинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu2: ӈэдаравыдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu3: ӈэдаравыдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl1: ӈэдаравынаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl2: ӈэдаравыдаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl3: ӈэдаравыдонзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Tra: ӈэдаравэӈэ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Car: ӈэдаравэси”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Equ: ӈэдаравэдарем’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Equ+Lat: ӈэдаравэдарев’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Nom+Abs: [ӈэдараванда, ӈэдаравнда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Acc+Abs: [ӈэдаравандам’, ӈэдаравндам’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Gen+Abs: [ӈэдараванда’, ӈэдаравнда’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Dat+Abs: [ӈэдаравандан’, ӈэдаравндан’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Loc+Abs: [ӈэдаравандахана, ӈэдаравндахана]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Abl+Abs: [ӈэдаравандахад, ӈэдаравндахад]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Pros+Abs: [ӈэдаравандавна, ӈэдаравндавна]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Nom+Abs: [ӈэдаравандаха’, ӈэдаравндаха’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Acc+Abs: [ӈэдаравандаха’, ӈэдаравндаха’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Gen+Abs: [ӈэдаравандаха’, ӈэдаравндаха’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Nom+Abs: [ӈэдараванда”, ӈэдаравнда”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Acc+Abs: [ӈэдараванди, ӈэдаравнди]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Gen+Abs: [ӈэдараванди”, ӈэдаравнди”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Dat+Abs: [ӈэдаравандаха”, ӈэдаравндаха”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Loc+Abs: [ӈэдаравандаха”на, ӈэдаравндаха”на]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Abl+Abs: [ӈэдаравандахат, ӈэдаравндахат]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Pros+Abs: [ӈэдараванди”мна, ӈэдаравнди”мна]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандав, ӈэдаравндав, ӈэдаравандами, ӈэдаравндами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандав, ӈэдаравндав, ӈэдаравандами, ӈэдаравндами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандан, ӈэдаравндан, ӈэдаравандани, ӈэдаравндани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандахан, ӈэдаравндахан, ӈэдаравандахани, ӈэдаравндахани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандаханан, ӈэдаравндаханан, ӈэдаравандаханани, ӈэдаравндаханани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандахадан, ӈэдаравндахадан, ӈэдаравандахадани, ӈэдаравндахадани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандавнан, ӈэдаравндавнан, ӈэдаравандавнани, ӈэдаравндавнани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандахаюн, ӈэдаравндахаюн, ӈэдаравандахаюни, ӈэдаравндахаюни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандахаюн, ӈэдаравндахаюн, ӈэдаравандахаюни, ӈэдаравндахаюни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандахаюн, ӈэдаравндахаюн, ӈэдаравандахаюни, ӈэдаравндахаюни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравандин, ӈэдаравндин, ӈэдаравандини, ӈэдаравндини]
